Hawaii statutes.
§291C-163 Powers of counties. (a)
This chapter shall not be deemed to prevent counties with respect to streets
and highways under their jurisdiction from:

(1) Regulating or prohibiting stopping, standing, or
parking except as pro­vided in section 291C-111;

(2) Regulating traffic by means of police officers or
official traffic-control devices;

(3) Regulating or prohibiting processions or
assemblages on the highways;

(4) Designating particular highways or roadways for
use by traffic moving in one direction;

(5) Establishing speed limits for vehicles in public
parks;

(6) Designating any highway as a through highway or
designating any intersection as a stop or yield intersection;

(7) Restricting the use of highways;

(8) Regulating the operation and equipment of and
requiring the registration and inspection of bicycles, including the
requirement of a registration fee;

(9) Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles
or specified types of vehicles;

(10) Altering or establishing speed limits;

(11) Requiring written accident reports;

(12) Designating no-passing zones;

(13) Prohibiting or regulating the use of
controlled-access roadways by any class or kind of traffic;

(14) Prohibiting or regulating the use of heavily
traveled streets by any class or kind of traffic found to be incompatible with
the normal and safe move­ment of traffic;

(15) Establishing minimum speed limits;

(16) Designating hazardous railroad grade crossing;

(17) Designating and regulating traffic on play
streets;

(18) Prohibiting pedestrians from crossing a roadway
in a business district or any designated highway except in a crosswalk;

(19) Restricting pedestrian crossing at unmarked
crosswalks;

(20) Regulating persons propelling push carts;

(21) Regulating persons upon skates, coasters, sleds,
and other toy vehicles;

(22) Adopting and enforcing such temporary or
experimental regulations as may be necessary to cover emergencies or special
conditions;

(23) Adopting maximum and minimum speed limits on
streets and highways within their respective jurisdictions;

(24) Adopting requirements on stopping, standing, and
parking on streets and highways within their respective jurisdictions except as
provided in section 291C-111;

(25) Prohibiting or regulating electric personal assistive
mobility devices on sidewalks and bicycle paths; and

(26) Adopting such other traffic regulations as are
specifically authorized by this chapter.

(b) No local authority shall erect or maintain
any official traffic-control device at any location so as to require the
traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or crossing any
intersecting highway unless approval in writing has first been obtained from
the director of transportation. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 238, §2;
am L 1998, c 234, §§4, 29; am L 1999, c 263, §5; am L 2000, c 240, §21; am L
2001, c 55, §14; am L 2002, c 58, §2; am L 2009, c 78, §2]

Cross References

County regulation of commercial bicycle tours, see §46-16.3.

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (a)(1) and (24) does not authorize counties to
enact provisions inconsistent with §291C-95. Att. Gen. Op. 75-4.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next